Illinois, session 104th, HB2235.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Mercury-added Product Prohibition Act is 5amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (410 ILCS 46/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Mercury-added Product Prohibition Act.9(Source: P.A. 95-87, eff. 8-13-07.)